District of Columbia statutes.
4-1501.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Applicant” means an individual who has filed a written application for employment with a covered child or youth services provider or an individual who has made an affirmative effort through a written application or a verbal request to serve in an unsupervised volunteer position with a covered child or youth services provider.

(2)

“Children” means individuals 12 years of age and under.

(3)

“Covered child or youth services provider” means any District government agency providing direct services to children or youth and any private entity that contracts with the District to provide direct services to children or youth, or for the benefit of children or youth, that affect the health, safety, and welfare of children or youth, including individual and group counseling, therapy, case management, supervision, or mentoring. The term “covered child or youth services provider” does not include foster parents or grantees.

(4)

“Criminal background check” means the investigation of an individual’s criminal history through the record systems of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Metropolitan Police Department.

(5)

“Employee” means an individual who is employed on a full-time, part-time, temporary, or contractual basis by any covered child or youth services provider.

(6)

“FBI” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(7)

“MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.

(8)

“Supervised” means any person who is under the direct supervision, at all times, of an employee or a volunteer who has received a current, satisfactory criminal background check.

(9)

“Volunteer” means an individual who works without any monetary or any other financial compensation for a covered child or youth services provider.

(10)

“Youth” means an individual between 13 and 17 years of age, inclusive.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 202, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 202 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 202 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 202 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 202 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 202 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 202 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 202 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 202 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 202 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 202 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).